Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Supervisor" means an assistant director known as the supervisor of plant industry.

(2) "Horticultural premises" includes orchards, vineyards, nurseries, berry farms, vegetable farms, cultivated cranberry marshes, packing houses, dryhouses, warehouses, depots, docks, cars, vessels and other places where nursery stock, fruits, vegetables and other horticultural products are grown, stored, packed, shipped, held for shipment or delivery, sold or otherwise disposed of.

(3) "Nursery stock" includes, but is not limited to, any horticultural, floricultural, viticultural, and vegetable plant, for planting, propagation or ornamentation, growing or otherwise, including cut plant material.

(4) "Pests and diseases" means, but is not limited to, any living stage of any insect, mite, nematode, slug, snail, protozoa, or other invertebrate animal, bacteria, fungus, other parasitic plant, weed, or reproductive part thereof, virus or any organism similar to or allied with any of the foregoing, or any infectious substance, which can directly or indirectly injure or cause disease or damage in or to any plant or parts thereof, or any processed, manufactured, or other products of plants.

(5) "Nuisance" means any plant, produce or property found in any commercial area upon which is found any pest or disease that is or may be a source of infestation of other properties.

(6) "Commercial area" means a district where any horticultural product is being produced to the extent that a producer is dependent thereon, in whole or in part, for his or her livelihood.

(7) "Infect," and its derivatives "infected," "infecting," and "infection," means affected by or infested with pests or diseases as above defined.

(8) "Disinfect," and its derivatives, means the control, cure, or eradication of such pests or diseases by cutting or destroying infected parts or the application of effective pesticides.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6005; 1981 c 296 s 4; 1961 c 11 s 15.08.010. Prior: (i) 1943 c 150 s 1, part; 1937 c 148 s 1, part; 1927 c 311 s 1, part; 1921 c 141 s 1, part; 1915 c 166 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2839, part. (ii) 1941 c 20 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 2849-1b. (iii) 1941 c 20 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 2849-1c. (iv) 1941 c 20 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 2849-1d. (v) 1923 c 37 s 3, part; 1921 c 141 s 4, part; 1915 c 166 s 5, part; RRS s 2843, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 296: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 296 s 40.]